Maryland, session 2026, HB0582.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb0582*

HOUSE BILL 582
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
26–102.
This title applies only in Prince George’s County.
26–1004.
(a) There is a Class C (country club) beer, wine, and liquor license.
(b) An application for the license shall be signed by at least one officer of the
country club who is a resident[, registered voter,] and taxpayer.
26–1005.
(a) There is a Class C (country and golf club) beer, wine, and liquor license.
(b) An application for the license shall be signed by at least one officer of the
country and golf club who is a resident[, registered voter,] and taxpayer of the county.
26–1008.
(a) There is a Class B/ECF (educational conference facility) beer, wine, and liquor
license for the University College Center for Adult Education of the University of Maryland.
(b) The Board may issue the license to an individual who is:
(1) authorized by the University College Center for Adult Education to:
(i) act on its behalf;
(ii) assume all responsibility; and
(iii) be subject to all the penalties, conditions, and restrictions
imposed on licenses; and
(2) a resident [and registered voter] of the county.
26–1009.
(a) There is a Class B–ECF/DS (Education Conference Facility/Dining Service)
beer, wine, and liquor license.
(b) The Board may issue the license to an individual who is:

HOUSE BILL 582 3
(1) (i) authorized by the University of Maryland, College Park Campus
to:
1. act on its behalf under the license; and
2. be subject to the penalties, conditions, and restrictions
under this title; and
(ii) a resident [and registered voter] of the county; or
(2) (i) authorized by the Prince George’s Community College Main
Campus to:
1. act on its behalf under the license; and
2. be subject to the penalties, conditions, and restrictions
under this title; and
(ii) a resident [and registered voter] of the county.
26–1019.
(a) There is a Class C (yacht club) beer, wine, and liquor license.
(b) The application for the license shall be signed by at least one officer of the
yacht club who is a resident[, registered voter,] and taxpayer of the county.
26–1405.
(a) This section does not apply to:
(1) a racetrack license;
(2) a Class BLX license;
(3) an arena license;
(4) a Class BCE (catering) license;
(5) a Class B–CC (convention center) license;
(6) a Class B/ECF (educational conference facility) license;
(7) the issuance, renewal, or transfer of Class B–DD (development district)
licenses; or
(8) a business whose stock or interest is authorized for sale by the United

HOUSE BILL 582
States Securities and Exchange Commission.
(c) (1) This subsection does not apply to a Class B–Stadium (baseball stadium)
beer, wine, and liquor license, a 7–day Class B–ECR on–sale beer, wine, and liquor license,
or a Class B–WPL (waterfront pavilion) beer, wine, and liquor license.
(2) To be eligible to receive a license, a partner shall[:
(i)] be a resident of the State at the time the application is filed and
continue to be a resident as long as the license is in effect[; and
(ii) be a registered voter of the State].
26–1406.
(a) This section does not apply to:
(1) a racetrack license;
(2) a Class BLX license;
(3) an arena license;
(4) a Class BCE (catering) license;
(5) a Class B–CC (convention center) license;
(6) a Class B/ECF (educational conference facility) license;
(7) the issuance, renewal, or transfer of Class B–DD (development district)
licenses; or
(8) a business whose stock or interest is authorized for sale by the United
States Securities and Exchange Commission.
(c) (1) This subsection does not apply to a Class B–Stadium (baseball stadium)
beer, wine, and liquor license, a 7–day Class B–ECR on–sale beer, wine, and liquor license,
or a Class B–WPL (waterfront pavilion) beer, wine, and liquor license.
(2) To be eligible to receive a license, an applicant shall[:
(i)] be a resident of the State at the time the application is filed and
continue to be a resident as long as the license is in effect[; and
(ii) be a registered voter of the State].

HOUSE BILL 582 5
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.